Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB481.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Title 75 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding a section to read:§ 4910. Milk hauling during inclement weather and emergency declaration.(a) Movement upon highways.--A combination up to 80,000 pounds, combination consistent with section 4968(a.2)(4) (relating to permit for movement during course of manufacture) or farm vehicle which is hauling a milk product to or from a milk plant or to or from a dairy farm, or is traveling to a dairy farm to pick up a milk product, shall be allowed by the <--1234567891011121314151617 department, local authorities and law enforcement to move upon highways within their respective jurisdiction 24 hours a day, seven days a week during:(1) Inclement weather as defined in department regulations when the department restricts the operation of a combination or farm vehicle.(2) A declared national, State or local emergency when the Governor issues a proclamation or executive order impeding the operation of a combination or farm vehicle.(b) Decal.--A one-time decal, designed and issued by the board, that identifies the combination or farm vehicle as a licensed milk hauler shall be placed on the driver's side of the cab of the combination or farm vehicle. The board shall charge a fee for the issuance of the decal, the amount of which fee may not exceed the administrative costs of producing and issuing the decal and may impose the same fee to replace a decal that has been lost, stolen, damaged or become illegible.(c) Penalty prohibited.--A penalty may not be imposed on the driver of a combination or farm vehicle if the operation of the vehicle complies with this section.(d) Definitions.--As used in this section, the following words and phrases shall have the meanings given to them in this subsection unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Board." The Pennsylvania Milk Board."Dairy farm." As defined in section 1 of the act of July 2, 1935 (P.L.589, No.210), referred to as the Milk Sanitation Law."Milk plant." As defined in section 1 of the Milk Sanitation Law.Section 2. Section 4968(a.2)(4) and (b) of Title 75 are amended to read:20250SB0481PN1819 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 § 4968. Permit for movement during course of manufacture.* * *(a.2) Specifications.--* * *(4) A combination [of vehicles] which is hauling milk to or from a [manufacturer] milk plant or to or from a dairy farm, or is traveling to a dairy farm to pick up milk, may be permitted by the department and local authorities to move upon highways within their respective jurisdictions 24 hours a day, seven days a week, [except during inclement weather as defined in department regulations,] consistent with section 4910 (relating to milk hauling during inclement weather and emergency declaration) if the gross weight does not exceed 95,000 pounds and the weight of any nonsteering axle does not exceed 21,000 pounds. A permit may be issued for this type of movement upon an interstate highway. An application to the department for the movement of milk, except for raw milk, shall designate the route the applicant requests to use.* * *(b) Definitions.--As used in this section, the following words and phrases shall have the meanings given to them in this subsection:"Bulk milk." The term shall mean milk, as defined in section 1 of the act of July 2, 1935 (P.L.589, No.210), referred to as the Milk Sanitation Law, which is not transported in packages."Condensed milk" and "evaporated milk." The term shall mean manufactured dairy products as defined in section 1 of the act of July 2, 1935 (P.L.589, No.210), referred to as the Milk 20250SB0481PN1819 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Sanitation Law, which is not transported in packages."Dairy farm." As defined in section 1 of the act of July 2, 1935 (P.L.589, No.210), referred to as the Milk Sanitation Law."Hot box." Consists of an enclosure consisting of welded steel plate chained to a semitrailer with a removable lid lined with refraction for purposes of insulation and retention of heat."Milk." The term shall mean any of the following:(1) Bulk milk.(2) Evaporated milk.(3) Raw milk.(4) Condensed milk."Milk plant." As defined in section 1 of the act of July 2, 1935 (P.L.589, No.210), referred to as the Milk Sanitation Law."Raw milk." [Has the meaning given to it in] As defined in section 8(a) of the act of July 2, 1935 (P.L.589, No.210), referred to as the Milk Sanitation Law."Sugar." The term shall refer to granulated raw, semi-refined or refined sugar derived from the processing of sugar cane or sugar beets, requiring further processing and not intended for direct consumption or retail sale.Section 3. This act shall take effect in 60 days.AMENDING TITLE 75 (VEHICLES) OF THE PENNSYLVANIA CONSOLIDATED STATUTES, IN SIZE, WEIGHT AND LOAD, FURTHER PROVIDING FOR PERMIT FOR MOVEMENT DURING COURSE OF MANUFACTURE.THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE COMMONWEALTH OF PENNSYLVANIA HEREBY ENACTS AS FOLLOWS:SECTION 1. SECTION 4968(A.2)(4) AND (B) OF TITLE 75 OF THE PENNSYLVANIA CONSOLIDATED STATUTES ARE AMENDED TO READ:§ 4968. PERMIT FOR MOVEMENT DURING COURSE OF MANUFACTURE.* * *20250SB0481PN1819 - 4 - <--12345678910111213141516171819202122232425262728293031 (A.2) SPECIFICATIONS.--* * *(4) A COMBINATION OF VEHICLES WHICH IS HAULING MILK TO OR FROM A [MANUFACTURER] MILK PLANT OR TO OR FROM A DAIRY FARM, OR IS TRAVELING TO A DAIRY FARM OR MILK PLANT TO PICK UP MILK, MAY BE PERMITTED BY THE DEPARTMENT AND LOCAL AUTHORITIES TO MOVE UPON SPECIFIED HIGHWAYS, INCLUDING INTERSTATE HIGHWAYS, WITHIN THEIR RESPECTIVE JURISDICTIONS 24 HOURS A DAY, SEVEN DAYS A WEEK, EXCEPT DURING INCLEMENT WEATHER AS DEFINED IN DEPARTMENT REGULATIONS[, IF THE GROSS WEIGHT DOES NOT EXCEED 95,000 POUNDS AND THE WEIGHT OF ANY NONSTEERING AXLE DOES NOT EXCEED 21,000 POUNDS. A PERMIT MAY BE ISSUED FOR THIS TYPE OF MOVEMENT UPON AN INTERSTATE HIGHWAY. AN APPLICATION TO THE DEPARTMENT FOR THE MOVEMENT OF MILK, EXCEPT FOR RAW MILK, SHALL DESIGNATE THE ROUTE THE APPLICANT REQUESTS TO USE.] IF ALL OF THE FOLLOWING APPLY:(I) THE COMBINATION OF VEHICLES IS ONE OF THE FOLLOWING:(A) A FIVE-AXLE COMBINATION VEHICLE HAULING MILK WITH A GROSS WEIGHT NOT EXCEEDING 95,000 POUNDS.(B) A SIX-AXLE COMBINATION VEHICLE HAULING RAW MILK OR BULK MILK WITH A GROSS WEIGHT NOT EXCEEDING 107,000 POUNDS.(C) A SEVEN-AXLE COMBINATION VEHICLE HAULING RAW MILK OR BULK MILK WITH A GROSS WEIGHT NOT EXCEEDING 117,000 POUNDS.(II) THE WEIGHT OF ANY NONSTEERING AXLE DOES NOT EXCEED 21,000 POUNDS.(III) THE APPLICATION FOR A PERMIT DESIGNATES THE ROUTE THAT THE APPLICANT REQUESTS TO USE. THIS 20250SB0481PN1819 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 SUBPARAGRAPH SHALL NOT APPLY TO AN APPLICATION FOR A PERMIT FOR A FIVE-AXLE COMBINATION VEHICLE HAULING RAW MILK OR BULK MILK WITH A GROSS WEIGHT NOT EXCEEDING 95,000 POUNDS.(IV) IF SUBPARAGRAPH (III) APPLIES, THE DEPARTMENT OR LOCAL AUTHORITY APPROVING THE PERMIT DETERMINES THAT THE ROUTE REQUESTED UNDER SUBPARAGRAPH (III) IS CAPABLE OF HANDLING THE APPLICABLE GROSS WEIGHT UNDER SUBPARAGRAPH (I).(B) DEFINITIONS.--AS USED IN THIS SECTION, THE FOLLOWING WORDS AND PHRASES SHALL HAVE THE MEANINGS GIVEN TO THEM IN THIS SUBSECTION:"BULK MILK." THE TERM SHALL MEAN MILK, AS DEFINED IN SECTION 1 OF THE ACT OF JULY 2, 1935 (P.L.589, NO.210), REFERRED TO AS THE MILK SANITATION LAW, WHICH IS NOT TRANSPORTED IN PACKAGES."CONDENSED MILK" AND "EVAPORATED MILK." THE TERM SHALL MEAN MANUFACTURED DAIRY PRODUCTS AS DEFINED IN SECTION 1 OF THE ACT OF JULY 2, 1935 (P.L.589, NO.210), REFERRED TO AS THE MILK SANITATION LAW, WHICH IS NOT TRANSPORTED IN PACKAGES."DAIRY FARM." HAS THE MEANING GIVEN TO IT IN SECTION 1 OF THE ACT OF JULY 2, 1935 (P.L.589, NO.210), REFERRED TO AS THE MILK SANITATION LAW."HOT BOX." CONSISTS OF AN ENCLOSURE CONSISTING OF WELDED STEEL PLATE CHAINED TO A SEMITRAILER WITH A REMOVABLE LID LINED WITH REFRACTION FOR PURPOSES OF INSULATION AND RETENTION OF HEAT."MILK." THE TERM SHALL MEAN ANY OF THE FOLLOWING:(1) BULK MILK.(2) EVAPORATED MILK.(3) RAW MILK.20250SB0481PN1819 - 6 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (4) CONDENSED MILK."MILK PLANT." HAS THE MEANING GIVEN TO IT IN SECTION 1 OF THE ACT OF JULY 2, 1935 (P.L.589, NO.210), REFERRED TO AS THE MILK SANITATION LAW."RAW MILK." HAS THE MEANING GIVEN TO IT IN THE ACT OF JULY 2, 1935 (P.L.589, NO.210), REFERRED TO AS THE MILK SANITATION LAW."SUGAR." THE TERM SHALL REFER TO GRANULATED RAW, SEMI-REFINED OR REFINED SUGAR DERIVED FROM THE PROCESSING OF SUGAR CANE OR SUGAR BEETS, REQUIRING FURTHER PROCESSING AND NOT INTENDED FOR DIRECT CONSUMPTION OR RETAIL SALE.SECTION 2. THIS ACT SHALL TAKE EFFECT IN 60 DAYS.20250SB0481PN1819 - 7 - 123456789101112